Hawaii statutes.
[§465D-5] Powers and duties of the
director. In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law,
the director shall have the powers and duties to:

(1) Grant, deny, renew, refuse to renew, restore,
terminate, reinstate, condition, restrict, suspend, or revoke a license issued
pursuant to this chapter;

(2) Grant permission to a person to engage in the
practice of behavior analysis and to use the title of "licensed behavior
analyst" or a description indicating that the person is a licensed behavior
analyst in this State;

(3) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules pursuant to chapter
91 as the director finds necessary to carry out this chapter;

(4) Administer, coordinate, and enforce this chapter;

(5) Discipline a licensed behavior analyst on grounds
specified by this chapter or chapter 436B or for any violation of rules adopted
by the director pursuant to this chapter; and

(6) Refuse to license a person for failure to meet
the licensing requirements in this chapter or for any reason specified by this
chapter as grounds to discipline a behavior analyst including but not limited
to violations of the Behavior Analyst Certification Board's ethical guidelines
for responsible conduct. [L 2015, c 199, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next